Texas statutes.
AGRICULTURE CODE

TITLE 6. PRODUCTION, PROCESSING, AND SALE OF ANIMAL PRODUCTS

SUBTITLE C. CONTROL OF ANIMAL DISEASES AND PESTS

CHAPTER 168. PULLORUM DISEASE AND FOWL TYPHOID CONTROL

Sec. 168.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Commission" means the Texas Animal Health Commission.

(2) "Laboratory" means the Texas Veterinary Medical Diagnostic Laboratory.

(3) "Flock" means poultry and eggs produced by poultry.

(4) "Hatchery" means an enterprise that operates equipment for the hatching of eggs.

(5) "Poultry" means domestic fowl, including chickens, turkeys, and game birds.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1454, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 1, eff. April 19, 1991.

Sec. 168.002. CONTROL AND ERADICATION PROGRAM. The laboratory shall promulgate and administer a program to control and eradicate pullorum disease and fowl typhoid, with standards at least as stringent as those specified in the National Poultry Improvement Plan (7 U.S.C. Section 429).

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1455, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 168.003. ADMINISTRATION OF PROGRAM; SEARCH WARRANT. (a) In administering the program, the laboratory may:

(1) require the registration of hatcheries and hatchery supply flocks;

(2) examine, test, monitor, and collect samples from any flock, whether a hatchery supply flock or not, if the flock is suspected of being infected or a potential source of infection;

(3) examine, test, monitor, and collect samples from any hatchery supply flock;

(4) enter premises where flocks are kept or eggs are hatched as necessary to administer this chapter; and

(5) promulgate rules necessary to the control and eradication of pullorum disease and fowl typhoid.

(b) If a person conducting an inspection of premises under Subsection (a)(4) of this section desires to be accompanied by a peace officer, the person may apply to any magistrate in the county where the property is located for the issuance of a search warrant. In applying for the warrant, the person shall describe the premises or place to be entered and shall by oath or affirmation give evidence of probable cause to believe that entry is necessary for the control or eradication of pullorum disease or fowl typhoid. The application for the warrant and the warrant itself need only describe the property or premises in terms sufficient to enable the owner or caretaker to know what property is referred to in the documents. The warrant entitles the person to whom it is issued to be accompanied by a peace officer and by assistants. The issuing magistrate may not charge court costs or other fees for the issuance of this warrant.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1455, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 168.004. QUARANTINE AND DISPOSAL. (a) If the laboratory determines that any part of a flock is infected, it shall certify that information to the commission, and the commission shall verify the infection and immediately quarantine part or all of the flock. The commission may authorize the laboratory to quarantine an infected flock on behalf of the commission. The commission shall give notice of the quarantine in the same manner as provided by law for the quarantine of other livestock and fowl. The commission shall also order a cessation in the sale, movement, or exhibition of quarantined poultry or eggs and may seek an injunction to enforce an order concerning infected flocks.

(b) A quarantined flock shall be disposed of in a manner prescribed by the commission. If disposal involves movement to a state or federally inspected poultry processing establishment, the commission shall issue a certificate to accompany the flock. When the flock is disposed of and other measures necessary to the control and eradication of pullorum disease and fowl typhoid are taken, the commission shall remove the quarantine.

(c) The owner of a quarantined flock is entitled to a retesting of the flock before its disposal.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1455, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 70, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 168.005. PUBLIC EXHIBITION. A person may not enter poultry in public exhibition unless the stock originates from a flock or hatchery free of pullorum disease and fowl typhoid or has a negative pullorum-typhoid test after the 90th day before the day of the exhibition. Chickens or turkeys entered in public exhibition must be accompanied by a certificate of purchase from the hatchery.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1456, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981.

Sec. 168.006. ASSISTANCE BY FLOCK OWNER. The owner of a flock shall assist the laboratory and the commission in handling the poultry and shall pen and present the flock on request.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1456, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 168.007. NO FEE CHARGED. Neither the laboratory nor the commission may charge a fee for testing or laboratory examination provided for under this chapter.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1456, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.

Sec. 168.008. PENALTY. (a) A person commits an offense if the person refuses to:

(1) comply with an order of the commission or laboratory concerning an infected flock; or

(2) admit a person with a search warrant obtained as provided in Section 168.003 of this code.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(c) A person commits a separate offense for each day that the person refuses to comply with an order or admit a person with a search warrant.

Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 1456, ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1981. Amended by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 836, Sec. 71, eff. Sept. 1, 1989; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 40, Sec. 2, eff. April 19, 1991; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., 1st C.S., ch. 14, Sec. 2.01, eff. Nov. 12, 1991.